dictionaries/uk/index.aff
SFX w Y 146
SFX w ій ої ій
SFX w ій оїв ій
SFX w ій оям ій
SFX w ій оями ій
SFX w ій оях ій
SFX w іж ожі іж
SFX w іш оші іш
SFX w іб обів іб
SFX w ів овів ів
SFX w ід одів ід
SFX w іг огів іг
SFX w іж ожів іж
SFX w із озів із
SFX w ік оків ік
SFX w іл олів іл
SFX w ім омів ім
SFX w ін онів ін
SFX w іп опів іп
SFX w ір орів ір
SFX w іс осів іс
SFX w іт отів іт
SFX w іш ошів іш
SFX w іб обам іб
SFX w ів овам ів
SFX w ід одам ід
SFX w іг огам іг
SFX w іж ожам іж
SFX w із озам із
SFX w ік окам ік
SFX w іл олам іл
SFX w ім омам ім
SFX w ін онам ін
SFX w іп опам іп
SFX w ір орам ір
SFX w іс осам іс
SFX w іт отам іт
SFX w іш ошам іш
SFX w іб обами іб
SFX w ів овами ів
SFX w ід одами ід
SFX w іг огами іг
SFX w іж ожами іж
SFX w із озами із
SFX w ік оками ік
SFX w іл олами іл
SFX w ім омами ім
SFX w ін онами ін
SFX w іп опами іп
SFX w ір орами ір
SFX w іс осами іс
SFX w іт отами іт
SFX w іш ошами іш
SFX w іб обах іб
SFX w ів овах ів
SFX w ід одах ід
SFX w іг огах іг
SFX w іж ожах іж
SFX w із озах із
SFX w ік оках ік
SFX w іл олах іл
SFX w ім омах ім
SFX w ін онах ін
SFX w іп опах іп
SFX w ір орах ір
SFX w іс осах іс
SFX w іт отах іт
SFX w іш ошах іш
SFX w іль олі іль
SFX w іль олів іль
SFX w іль олям іль
SFX w іль олями іль
SFX w іль олях іль
SFX w інь оні кінь
SFX w інь оней кінь
SFX w інь оням кінь
SFX w інь онями кінь
SFX w інь іньми кінь
SFX w інь онях кінь
SFX w ізд озди ізд
SFX w ізк озки ізк
SFX w ізт озти ізт
SFX w ірд орди ірд
SFX w ірк орки ірк
SFX w ірт орти ірт
SFX w ісд осди ісд
SFX w іск оски іск
SFX w іст ости іст
SFX w ізд оздів ізд
SFX w ізк озків ізк
SFX w ізт озтів ізт
SFX w ірд ордів ірд
SFX w ірк орків ірк
SFX w ірт ортів ірт
SFX w ісд осдів ісд
SFX w іск осків іск
SFX w іст остів іст
SFX w ізд оздам ізд
SFX w ізк озкам ізк
SFX w ізт озтам ізт
SFX w ірд ордам ірд
SFX w ірк оркам ірк
SFX w ірт ортам ірт
SFX w ісд осдам ісд
SFX w іск оскам іск
SFX w іст остам іст
SFX w ізд оздами ізд
SFX w ізк озками ізк
SFX w ізт озтами ізт
SFX w ірд ордами ірд
SFX w ірк орками ірк
SFX w ірт ортами ірт
SFX w ісд осдами ісд
SFX w іск осками іск
SFX w іст остами іст
SFX w ізд оздах ізд
SFX w ізк озках ізк
SFX w ізт озтах ізт
SFX w ірд ордах ірд
SFX w ірк орках ірк
SFX w ірт ортах ірт
SFX w ісд осдах ісд
SFX w іск осках іск
SFX w іст остах іст
SFX w іб оби іб
SFX w ів ови ів
SFX w ід оди ід
SFX w іг оги іг
SFX w із ози із
SFX w ік оки ік
SFX w іл оли іл
SFX w ім оми ім
SFX w ін они ін
SFX w іп опи іп
SFX w ір ори ір
SFX w іс оси іс
SFX w іт оти іт
SFX w івш овші івш
SFX w івш овшів івш
SFX w івш овшам івш
SFX w івш овшами івш
SFX w івш овшах івш
SFX w ість ості ість
SFX w ість остей ість
SFX w ість остям ість
SFX w ість остями ість
SFX w ість остях ість
SFX x Y 7
SFX x 0 е [^аєиійоуьюякгх]
SFX x г же г
SFX x х ше х
SFX x зь же зь
SFX x к че к
SFX x ець че ець
SFX x о е о
SFX y Y 17
SFX y 0 му ти
SFX y 0 меш ти
SFX y 0 ме ти
SFX y 0 мемо ти
SFX y 0 мем ти
SFX y 0 мете ти
SFX y 0 муть ти
SFX y ся муся тися
SFX y ся мусь тися
SFX y ся мешся тися
SFX y ся меться тися
SFX y ся мемося тися
SFX y ся мемось тися
SFX y ся мемся тися
SFX y ся метеся тися
SFX y ся метесь тися
SFX y ся муться тися
SFX z Y 15
SFX z іб ебе іб
SFX z ів еве ів
SFX z іг еге іг
SFX z іж еже іж
SFX z іл еле іл
SFX z ін ене ін
SFX z іп епе іп
SFX z ір ере ір
SFX z іс есе іс
SFX z іт ете іт
SFX z іш еше іш
SFX z ідь еде ідь
SFX z іль еле іль
SFX z інь ене інь
SFX z їв єве їв
SFX { Y 4
SFX { і ім і
SFX { і і і
SFX { і іх і
SFX { і іми і
