dictionaries/uk/index.dic
Авігдор/1:x
автоміст/0uw
автостопер/1:$x
автоцементовіз/0uw
Адоніс/1:x
аероміст/0uw
актуалізатор/1:$x
алгоритмізувати/XytN
альт-саксофоніст/1:$x
англофоб/1:$x
антинорманіст/1:$x
Арбат/1x
Артищів/2@z
артпростір/0w
архаїст/1:$x
Атаян/1:x
атестовувати/Xyt
аудіовихід/0w
аудіопристрій/0w
бабак/1:$x
багат-вечір/0uw
балканіст/1:$x
Бассомп'єр/1:x
Батиїв/j2@z
бахурувати/Xyt
Бежів/2@z
Беккер/1:x
Бердичів/2@z
Бертишів/2@z
Бессінджер/1:x
бетонопровід/0w
Білашів/2@z
білозір/0uw6
біло-сині/{
більд-редактор/1:$x
блискавковідвід/0w
Боблів/2@z
Бовкун/1:x
Бодячів/2@z
Болячів/2@z
бомбувати/Xyt
борисфеніт/1:$x
Бортнів/2@z
Братишів/2@z
Бребенескул/1x
брід/0w
Буглів/2@z
буккросер/1:$x
Булів/2@z
бульбоплід/0uw
буритися/XytLJ
Буцнів/2@z
вагант/1:$x
вантажопотік/0w
ватажанин/1:8x
Вачів/2@z
вбувати/YyO
вегетувати/Xyt
велозагін/0w
велотурист/1:$x
Вербаїв/2@z
веслоніс/0uw6
ветсанексперт/1:$x
вибиватися/YyO
вибій/0w
виворіт/0w
вигинатися/YyO
Виграїв/2@z
вижирати/YyO
викривлюватися/Xyt
викрій/0w
вимолювати/Xyt'
випорожнювати/Xyt'
виріб/0w
висвідчувати/Xyt
вислів/0w
вистругувати/Xyt
Витачів/2@z
виформовуватися/Xyt
вишкіл/0w
Вишнів/2@z
вишпарюватися/Xyt
відбір/0w
відгинатися/YyO
відгомін/0w
відеоміст/0uw
відкіт/0w
відкопувати/Xyt'
Віднів/2@z
відображатися/YyO
відсвіжуватися/Xyt
відтягуватися/Xyt
віз/0uw6
військспец/1:$x
вінчатися/YyO
вітражист/1:$x
вітрохід/0uw
вломлювати/Xyt
вогнищанин/1:8x
водовідвід/0w
водопій/0w
водотік/0w
Вороб'їв/2@z
Воропаїв/2@z
ворочатися/YyO
Воютин/1:x
вриватися/YyO
втелющувати/Xyt
вхід/0w
вщасливлювати/Xyt'
газонафтопровід/0w
газотурбохід/0uw
Гайшин/1:x
гамма-потік/0w
гарпунер/1:$x
геліофіл/1:$x
Гельм'язів/2@z
геометризувати/XytN
Геркулес/1:$x
гілозоїст/1:$x
гін/0w
глід/0w
Гніздичів/2@z
гніт/1:$0uw
гобоїст/1:$x
гоїтися/XJyt
Голешів/2@z
Голосіїв/2@z
горе-голкіпер/1:$x
Горичів/2@z
госпдоговір/0w
градовідвід/0w
Гребенів/2@z
Грехем/1:x
Гриців/R2@z
громити/XLytN
Губарів/2@z
Гуменів/2@z
Гургандж/1:x
гуркіт/0w
Даничів/2@z
дармовіс/1:$x
дезінфікувати/XytN
Делятин/1:x
денонсувати/XytN
держзахід/0w
Держів/2@z
детермініст/1:$x
Джорджтаун/1:x
дзвін/0wu
дзявкотіти/Xyt
димопровід/0w
дівер/1:$x
діл/0w
добудовуватися/Xyt
довгоніс/0uw6
дозір/0w
доїжджати/YyO
Домашів/2@z
домосід/1:$x
домотуватися/Xyt
доокіл/0w
дорожчати/YyO
Дорошів/R2@z
дотягатися/YyO
дрізд/0uw6
Дробишів/2@z
дубенчанин/1:8x
дубоніс/0uw6
духопелити/Xyt
Едмондс/1:x
ексвокаліст/1:$x
екс-нардеп/1:$x
екс-шеф-редактор/1:$x
електродзвін/0w
електропотік/0w
електрохід/0uw
Енвер/1:$x
ескапіст/1:$x
етнохутір/0uw
єврокомісар/1:$x
Єфрон/1:x
жайвір/0uw6
жаргонізувати/XytN
Жежелів/2@z
Живачів/2@z
жовтохвіст/0uw6
Жовчів/2@z
Жозеп/1:x
забезпечуватися/Xyt
завій/0w
загарпунювати/Xyt'
задерихвіст/0uw
задраюватися/Xyt
законсервовуватися/Xyt
залюднятися/YyO
занотовувати/Xyt
запій/0w
запосягати/YyO
засікатися/YyO
заслін/0w
затаюватися/Xyt
захмарюватися/Xyt
зачіс/0w
збагачувати/Xyt'
Збігнев/1:x
Звеничів/2@z
звіробій/0uw
звужатися/Xyt
зернопровід/0w
зжинатися/YyO
Зліїв/2@z
Змітнів/2@z
зміцняти/YyO
знімчувати/Xyt
Золочів/2@z
Золтан/1:$x
зріст/0w
зціплятися/YyO
ідол/1:$x
Ілів/2@z
Інґмар/1:x
інтегруватися/Xyt
інтернетоман/1:$x
інформпотік/0w
ісмаїліт/1:$x
Йоханнес/1:x
Кагуїв/2@z
кадіб/0uw
Калкаїв/2@z
Кальміус/1x
канючити/XyJt
каптенармус/1:$x
Карабчиїв/2@z
Карапчів/2@z
Карів/2@z
картингіст/1:$x
Квінтиліан/1:x
Кендерешів/2@z
Киликиїв/2@z
Киселів/2@z
китобій/0uw
Кишинів/2@z
кібер-активіст/1:$x
кібер-ніж/0uw
кібер-простір/0w
кіновечір/0w
кіноексперт/1:$x
кінозахід/0w
кінь/0uw
кларнетист/1:$x
клеїти/Xyt
Клепачів/2@z
Клузів/2@z
Ковент-Гарден/1x
Козирів/2@z
козоріг/0uw6
Колонтаїв/2@z
Комарів/2@z
комбінатор/1:$x
компрометуватися/Xyt
Конів/2@z
Консепсьйон/1:x
контрдовід/0w
концтабір/0w
Коптів/2@z
Кормин/1x
Корнів/2@z
Коростишів/2@z
коротшати/YyO
Корчів/2@z
Косачів/2@z
Космачів/2@z
Костенів/2@z
Костів/2@z
Кошів/2@z
Країв/2@z
крамник/1:$x
краснопір/2@Iz
Кречів/2@z
кривоніс/0uw6
кріт/0uw6
кровопаразит/1:$x
крутихвіст/0uw6
крутійствувати/Xyt
Кугаїв/2@z
Кунів/2@z
Купин/1:x
Купичів/2@z
Кутелів/2@z
лазнюк/1:$x
Левант/1x
ледарювати/Xyt
летун/1:$x
Лешнів/2@z
Лідс/1:x
Ліктів/2@z
лірохвіст/0uw6
логофет/1:$x
лоскіт/0w
Лошнів/2@z
лучитися/Xyt
Любешів/2@z
людинолюб/1:$x
магнітопровід/0w
Мазяр/1:x
Малів/2@z
маніпулянт/1:$x
Мартиніан/1:$x
маслопровід/0w
матрицювати/Xyt
Матусів/2@z
медіаексперт/1:$x
медіазасіб/0w
медіапристрій/0w
медозбір/0w
Межирів/2@z
меноніт/1:$x
Мечищів/2@z
мечоніс/0uw6
Миколаїв/j2@z
митрополит/1:$x
Мичів/2@z
мікропідхід/0w
мінорувати/Xyt
місіонер/1:$x
міст/0uw
Мліїв/2@z
Моделів/2@z
монголіст/1:$x
мостоперехід/0w
мототурист/1:$x
мультиплікувати/Xyt
навігатор/1:$x
Нагачів/2@z
нагін/0w
нагнітатися/YyO
Надорожнів/2@z
надпростір/0w
надсипати/X'YyO
накрохмалюватися/Xyt
нанопростір/0w
напилюватися/Xyt
напівуклін/0w
наркозасіб/0w
насичуватися/Xyt
Натанз/1:x
нафтогазопровід/0w
нафтопродуктопровід/0w
нахабніти/YyO
невихід/0w
недокіс/0w
недосипляти/YyO
Неймар/1:x
непентес/1:x
Нечаїв/2@z
низькоділ/0w
новеліст/1:$x
новоутвір/0w
Носачів/2@z
О'Коннор/1:x$
об'їздити/XLNy
обгін/0w
обігравати/Xyt
Обмачів/2@z
обмітати/YyO
обсмикуватися/Xyt
овід/0uw6
огороджувати/Xyt'
Оженин/1:x
Озліїв/2@z
окіл/0w
окриляти/YyO
окружкові/{
оливопровід/0w
Олієво-Корнів/2@z
Ольчедаїв/2@z
опер/1:$x
оприбутковувати/Xyt
оргнабір/0w
Осняг/1:x
Остріїв/2@z
острокіл/0w
осцилювати/Xyt
Ощів/2@z
паливопровід/0w
Палмерстон/1:x
паразитувати/Xyt
парфянин/1:8x
пасажиропотік/0w
Пекарів/2@z
Первез/1:x
перебір/0w
переважати/YyO
перегін/0w
Перегноїв/2@z
перегріватися/YyO
передпокій/0w
переймати/YyO'
перекрій/0w
перемальовуватися/Xyt
переорюватися/Xyt
перепрошивати/YyO
перестрілювати/Xyt
перетік/0w
перешиватися/YyO
Петрушів/R2@z
пивовар/1:$x
пилепровід/0w
півострів/0uw
підводитися/XJyt
підгін/0w
підкручуватися/Xyt
підправляти/YyO
підпростір/0w
підтанцьовувати/Xyt
піонертабір/0w
Пітер/1:x$
Піщів/2@z
плестися/Xyt
пліт/0uw
повід/0uw
погойдуватися/Xyt
поет/1:$x
Покалів/2@z
Покришів/2@z
покрій/0w
політиканствувати/Xyt
Помпадур/1:x
Поничів/2@z
порошити/Xy
потягати/Y'yO
похід/0w
Почаїв/2@z
празничанин/1:8x
прибільшуватися/Xyt
приземлятися/YyO
прикордонзагін/0w
примішувати/Xyt
присвистувати/Xyt
притримувати/Xyt'
пробконіс/0uw6
пробст/1:$x
проводжувати/Xyt
прокидати/Y'yO
прокіл/0w
пропихуватися/Xyt
прострілюватися/Xyt
профактивіст/1:$x
прохід/0w
прошпигувати/XytN
псевдооператор/1:$x
Пьотр/1:x
Радичів/2@z
радіовечір/0uw
Райгород/1:x
реаніматор/1:$x
ревізуватися/Xyt
регіт/0w
рекреант/1:$x
Ременів/2@z
ретранслювати/XytN
Ржищів/2@z
Рим/1:x
Ріпнів/2@z
Родос/1x
Рожів/2@z
розбрід/0w
розбуртовувати/Xyt'
Розважів/2@z
розділювати/Xyt'
розкрадати/YyO
розліг/0w
розміщуватися/Xyt
розпоряджати/YyO
розстиковувати/Xyt
розціловуватися/Xyt
Рубіж/2z
Руїз/1:$x
рядитися/Xyt
Ряшів/2@z
Салгир/1:x
саморозігріватися/YyO
самохід/0uw
сапатист/1:$x
Сваричів/2@z
Свищів/2@z
свічкогас/1:$x
Себечів/2@z
Селичів/2@z
семіт/1:$x
Сенів/2@z
сечовід/0w
сибарит/1:$x
силіціювати/XytN
сільван/1:x
Скнит/1:x
сковувати/Xyt'
сліпорід/0uw6
смердіти/Xyt
смоловар/1:$x
Снячів/2@z
Сопачів/2@z
Софрон/1:$x
спецгість/0uw
спиноріг/0uw6
списуватися/Xyt
співрекордсмен/1:$x
споруджуватися/Xyt
Старозінів/2@z
Стахур/1:x
стимулювати/XytN
стіс/0w
Сторожів/2@z
Стресснер/1:x
стулюватися/Xyt
суперарбітр/1:$x
супербій/0w
супранатураліст/1:$x
Супрунів/2@z
сухостій/0w
Тайлер/1:$x
талувати/Xyt
театроман/1:$x
телепростір/0w
телепубліцист/1:$x
Терентіїв/j2@z
Тершів/2@z
тест-мікроб/1:$x
Тетіїв/2@z
тирлуватися/Xyt
Тихін/0u6w
Тоболів/2@z
той-тер'єр/1:$x
Токарів/2@z
транспортуватися/Xyt
Траулин/1:x
трубопровід/0w
Туличів/2@z
Тупичів/2@z
турпохід/0w
тяжчати/YyO
Угнів/2@z
ударяти/YyO
узурпатор/1:$x
уклін/0w
уладнувати/Xyt
Уніж/2@z
упереджувати/Xyt
усвідомлюватися/Xyt
утовкмачувати/Xyt'
Фанар/1x
фанеруватися/Xyt
Федір/0uw6
фітономус/1:$x
фрондувати/Xyt
фтизіатр/1:$x
хвіст/0uw
Хичів/2@z
Хірам/1:x
хмуритися/XJyt
Холонів/2@z
Хорів/2@z
Хотешів/2@z
Цеблів/2@z
Целіїв/2@z
цінитися/XLyt
ціп'як/1:$x
частокіл/0w
Чепелів/2@z
Черніїв/2@z
Чижів/2@z
чоботарювати/Xyt
Чугуїв/2@z
Шах-Деніз/1x
шкандибати/YyO
шламопровід/0w
Штайнбауер/1:x
Щеніїв/2@z
щепитися/Xyt
Якушів/2@z
яничар/1:$x
Яришів/2@z
